Hawaii statutes.
§660-31 Bail reduced, when. If the
person is committed because the person cannot furnish the bail ordered, and the
bail which is required appears to be excessive or unreasonable, the court shall
decide what bail is reasonable, and shall order that upon furnishing such bail
the person shall be discharged from custody. [L 1870, c 32, §23; RL 1925,
§2754; RL 1935, §4339; RL 1945, §10380; RL 1955, §239-31; HRS §660-31; am L
1972, c 90, §5(s); gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Bail of $300,000 held excessive for first degree murder. 56
H. 447, 539 P.2d 1197 (1975).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next